Rhode Island statutes. Title 20 Fish and Wildlife
Chapter 16 Furbearing Animals

20-16-1.
Furbearers protected.

No person shall hunt, pursue, shoot, or trap, or attempt so to do, the following furbearing mammals in this state, except in accordance with rules and regulations governing seasons, bag limits, and methods of taking adopted by the director pursuant to §

20-1-12

.

For the purposes of this chapter, “furbearers” shall be considered to include:

Carnivores (Order Carnivora):

Family Canidae, genus Canis (coyote); genus Urocyon (gray fox); genus Vulpes (red fox).

Family Procyonidae, genus Procyon (raccoon).

Family Mustelidae, genus Martes (fisher); genus Mustela, M. erminea (ermine), M. frenata (longtailed weasel), M. vison (mink), genus Mephitis (striped skunk), genus Lutra (river otter).

Family Felidae, genus Lynx (bobcat).

Rodents (Order Rodentia):

Family Castoridae, genus Castor (beaver).

Family Sciuridae, genus Sciurus (gray squirrel).

Family Cricetidae, genus Ondatra (muskrat).

Marsupials (Order Marsupialia): Family Didelphidae, genus Didelphis (opossum).

Rabbits and hares (Order Lagomorpha): Family Leporidae, genus Sylvilagus (Eastern and New England cottontail), genus Lepus (snowshoe hare).

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 197, § 3.

20-16-2.
Landowners — Nuisance furbearers.

Any person owning or leasing and operating any property, and any employee of that person, may, while on that person’s premises, kill and take a furbearer that is worrying, wounding, or killing the domestic animals or livestock on the property, or destroying or mutilating agricultural crops or fruit trees on the property; or otherwise causing clear-and-immediate economic damage to any property belonging to that person; or creating a potential health hazard; provided that, except in the case of rabbits, the carcass of the furbearer shall be presented to the department within twenty-four (24) hours of taking. The animal may then be possessed by the landowner or lessee for the use of the immediate family of the landowner or lessee, and shall not be sold or offered for sale, except by special permission of the director.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 197, § 3; P.L. 1994, ch. 248, § 1.

20-16-3.
Possession of ferrets prohibited.

No person shall own or have in his or her possession in this state a European ferret, nor shall any person use ferrets in hunting any game in this state. In addition to the penalties provided in §

20-1-16

, any person violating the provisions of this section shall forfeit the ferret(s). The director may, upon application, give special permission for ownership and possession of a European ferret.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 197, § 3; P.L. 1983, ch. 107, § 4.

20-16-4.
Raccoon hunting.

Raccoons may be taken and possessed with the use of a gun, when the taker is accompanied by a dog. No person shall hunt raccoons at night by the use of rifle larger than a twenty-two (22) caliber rim fire long rifle or by the use of shotgun shells carrying shot larger than number four (no. 4) shot or by the use of a light other than a kerosene lantern, exclusive of the pressure type, or a flashlight with more than six (6) cells. No person shall take, or attempt to take, raccoons by use of a light from a motor vehicle.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 197, § 3.

20-16-5.
Possession of live raccoons.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to prohibit a person from keeping a live raccoon or raccoons for either breeding or other purposes while having in his or her possession a permit or license issued by the department to do so.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 197, § 3.

20-16-6.
Prohibited methods of taking.

No person shall erect, set, repair, maintain, or tend any snare, or spread any poison, for the purpose of catching or killing any animal, except within buildings located on land owned or occupied by him or her, unless specifically allowed by regulations adopted under §

20-1-12

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 197, § 3.

20-16-7.
License required for trapping — Marking of traps.

No person shall set, maintain, or tend any trap for the purpose of taking, killing, or destroying any furbearing animal without first obtaining a trapping license from the department of environmental management; provided, however, that a resident of this state, or a member of the resident’s immediate family, may set traps without a license on land owned or leased by him or her and on which he or she is actually domiciled. The trapping license shall have the name of the licensee contained thereon, and every trap set by a licensee shall carry upon it a license identification, insignia, or number in any design, size, and form that the director shall designate. No license shall be issued to any nonresident from a state that does not afford to Rhode Island residents trapping privileges.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 197, § 3.

20-16-8.
Trapping — Steel jawed leghold traps.

No person shall use, set, place, or maintain or tend any steel-jawed, leghold trap to capture any furbearing mammal or other animal; provided, however, that any person may apply in writing to the director of the department of environmental management for a special permit to use a steel-jawed, leghold trap to be used on his or her property when there exists on his or her property an animal nuisance that cannot be reasonably abated except by the use of the trap.

If the director determines that this nuisance exists on the property of the applicant that cannot be reasonably abated by means not prohibited by this section, the director may then issue a permit to the applicant, for a period not exceeding ninety (90) days, to use, set, place, maintain, or tend any steel-jawed, leghold traps that the director may deem necessary to eliminate the nuisance.

Any person violating this section shall be punished by a fine not exceeding five hundred dollars ($500) or be imprisoned not exceeding one year, or both, and his or her trapping license and privilege to trap shall be revoked for one year from the date of conviction.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 197, § 3.

20-16-9.
Setting of traps.

No trap shall be set by any person on the enclosed land of another without the written permission of the owner of the land. Every trap shall be placed in a hole, brush pile, stone wall, or other protected place, so situated as to be inaccessible to any domestic animal. No person setting a trap, or traps, shall fail to visit the traps at least once every twenty-four (24) hours. No traps shall be set, staked, or placed where furbearing animals might be found before the opening day and time of the trapping season established pursuant to §

20-1-12

; all traps shall be removed by the last day of the season.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 197, § 3.

20-16-10.
Green pelt as evidence of unlawful taking.

The possession of a green pelt, or any part of a pelt, by any person, except during the open season for the animal and for ten (10) days thereafter, shall be prima facie evidence that the pelt, or part of a pelt, was unlawfully taken and possessed. For the purposes of this section a “green pelt” is defined to mean a pelt that is not dried, cured, or tanned.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 197, § 3.

20-16-11.
Disturbing traps of another.

No person shall disturb, tend, or possess a trap of another, or take a furbearing animal from the traps of another, unless specifically authorized to do so by the owner.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 197, § 3.

20-16-12.
Report of animals trapped.

Every holder of a trapping license shall make a report of the number and species of all furbearing animals taken by him or her on forms provided by the department within thirty (30) days of the end of the trapping season and before the expiration of the holder’s license. No renewal of a trapping license shall be granted unless the report has been made.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 197, § 3.

20-16-13.
Deprivation of trapping privileges on second conviction.

Any person convicted a second time of a violation of any of the provisions of this chapter shall, in addition to the penalties elsewhere prescribed, be deprived of the privilege of trapping for furbearing animals within this state for three (3) years thereafter under a penalty of thirty (30) days imprisonment for each offense.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 197, § 3.

20-16-14.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 197, § 3; Repealed by P.L. 2015, ch. 141, art. 20, § 17, effective June 30, 2015.

20-16-15.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 197, § 3; Repealed by P.L. 2015, ch. 141, art. 20, § 17, effective June 30, 2015.

20-16-16.
Digging or smoking out animals — Use of probes.

No person or persons shall remove, or attempt to remove, a live muskrat, raccoon, mink, otter, skunk, or fox from any hole in the ground, from any stone wall, from within any ledge or from under any stone, from any den or house, or from any hole in any log or tree by digging or smoking, or by probing with any wooden, metal, or other device. No person shall set a trap within eight feet (8´) from a muskrat house. The provision of this section may be waived by the director on application by a landowner seeking to protect his or her property from nuisance furbearers.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 197, § 3.

20-16-17.
Prohibition against hunting or killing otter.

No person shall hunt, trap, take, or kill an otter in this state. Any person violating the provision of this section shall be guilty of a civil violation and be subject to a fine of one hundred dollars ($100) for each offense. Jurisdiction over violations of this section shall be with the traffic tribunal.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 197, § 3; P.L. 2007, ch. 253, § 5; P.L. 2007, ch. 294, § 5.

20-16-18.
Unlawful possession or sale of furbearers.

It is unlawful for any person to have in his or her possession any furbearer, or any part of a furbearer, unless it has been legally taken under the provisions of this chapter or chapter 17 of this title, or shall have been legally imported from another state or country. It is unlawful for any person at any time to sell, or offer for sale, any cottontail rabbit, varying hare, or gray squirrel, or any part thereof, excepting inedible parts such as heads, feet, hides, skins, or tails.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 197, § 3.